Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2235.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LPENNSYLVANIA FIREFIGHTER AND EMERGENCYMEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDER RECRUITMENTAND RETENTION TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article relates to the Pennsylvania firefighter and 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 emergency medical service provider recruitment and retention tax credit.Section 1902-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Firefighter or emergency medical service provider." The term includes:(1) an active volunteer as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 79A03 (relating to definitions); and(2) a first responder who volunteers for or is employed by any of the following:(i) Career emergency medical services as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).(ii) An emergency medical services company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(iii) A fire company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(iv) A volunteer EMS company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(v) A volunteer fire company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(vi) A volunteer rescue company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802."Qualified taxpayer." A taxpayer who is a firefighter or emergency medical service provider."Tax credit." The Pennsylvania firefighter and emergency medical service provider recruitment and retention tax credit authorized under this article.20260HB2235PN2928 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tax liability." Liability for the tax imposed under Article III."Taxpayer." An individual subject to payment of tax under Article III.Section 1903-L. Credit for firefighter and emergency medical service personnel.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania firefighter and emergency medical service provider recruitment and retention tax credit is established.(b) Tax credit limit.--For a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026, a qualified taxpayer may claim a nonrefundable tax credit not to exceed $6,000 against the taxpayer's tax liability under Article III for that taxable year.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A qualified taxpayer must claim a tax credit on a return filed under section 330.(d) Adequate proof of eligibility.--A qualified taxpayer must submit proof of eligibility for the tax credit to the department at the time the qualified taxpayer submits a claim.(e) Applicability of tax credit.--The tax credit shall be considered a payment of estimated tax made under Part VIII of Article III.(f) Duration of tax credit.--A qualified taxpayer may claim the tax credit for the year in which the qualified taxpayer first becomes a qualified taxpayer and the next five consecutive tax years, as long as the individual remains a qualified taxpayer.Section 1904-L. Prohibitions.A qualified taxpayer may not carry over, carry back, sell, assign or transfer a tax credit.20260HB2235PN2928 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1905-L. Departmental duties.The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 1906-L. Applicability.The tax credit shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.Section 1907-L. Expiration.This article shall expire December 31, 2037.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2235PN2928 - 4 - 12345678910